Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.051

Compliance with chapter required.

It is a violation of RCW 18.130.190 for any person to practice the profession of veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry in this state, who has not complied with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1987 c 150 s 59.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.